Massachusetts, session 194th, H318.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 94 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2018 Official Edition, is hereby
amended by striking Section 92B in its entirety and inserting in place thereof the following new
section: -
Section 92B. All meats, poultry and edible fish, except soft shell clams and oysters, shall
be sold at retail only by weight and, except when sold in package form bearing a plain and
conspicuous statement of quantity of contents as provided in section one hundred and eighty-one,
such weight shall be determined at the time of sale. When meat, poultry, fish, or seafood is kept,
offered or exposed for sale from bulk by the portion or piece according to a pre-determined fixed
weight, the product identity and net weight shall be displayed, as well as the unit price at which it
is offered for sale. When meat, poultry, fish, or seafood is combined with some other food
of 2

element to form a distinctive food product, the quantity representation may be in terms of the
total weight of the product or combination, and a quantity representation need not be made for
each element provided a statement listing the ingredients in order of their predominance by
weight must also appear on the label. Whoever himself or by his servant or agent violates any
provision of this section shall be punished by a fine of ten dollars or shall be subject to a civil
citation as provided in section 29A of chapter 98.
of 2